Colorado statutes. Title 38. Property - Real and Personal
Article 51. Minimum Standards for Land Surveys and Plats

Editor’s note:

This article was numbered as article 2 of chapter 136, C.R.S. 1963. The substantive provisions of this article were repealed and reenacted in 1994, resulting in the addition, relocation, and elimination of sections as well as subject matter. For amendments to this article prior to 1994, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor’s notes following those sections that were relocated. For a detailed comparison of this article, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

38-51-101.
Applicability - state - county - local - persons.

The provisions of this article shall apply to all agencies of state, county, and local government as well as to individuals, corporations, and partnerships engaged in the private practice of land surveying. This article shall not apply to the location or relocation of mining claims pursuant to article 43 of title 34, C.R.S.

History.

Source:
L. 94:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1513, § 47, effective July 1.

Editor’s note:

This section is similar to former § 38-51-103, as it existed prior to 1994.

38-51-102.
Definitions.

As used in this article 51, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Accessory” means any physical evidence in the vicinity of a survey monument, the relative location of which is of public record and which is used to help perpetuate the location of the monument. Accessories shall be construed to include the accessories recorded in the original survey notes and additional reference points and dimensions furnished by subsequent land surveyors or attested to in writing by persons having personal knowledge of the original location of the monument.

“Aliquot corner” means any section corner or quarter section corner and any other corner in the public land survey system created by subdividing land according to the rules of procedure set forth in section 38-51-103.

“Bench mark” means any relatively immovable point on the earth whose elevation above or below an adopted datum is known.

“Block” means a parcel of land within a platted subdivision bounded on all sides by streets or avenues, other physical boundaries such as a body of water, or the exterior boundary of a platted subdivision.

“Board” means the state board of licensure for architects, professional engineers, and professional land surveyors, created in section 12-120-103.

“Control corner” means any land survey corner the position of which controls the location of the boundaries of a tract or parcel of land.

(6.3)

“Corner” means a point of reference determined by the surveying process.

“Exemption plat” or “subdivision exemption plat” means a subdivision plat which includes all of the information required by section 38-51-106 and which depicts a division of land or the creation of an interest in property for which the board of county commissioners has granted an exemption from subdivision regulations pursuant to section 30-28-101 (10)(d), C.R.S.

(7.5)

“Geographic information system land position” or “GIS land position” means a location in a geographic information system intended to control the mapping location of the boundaries of a tract or parcel of land that may be field surveyed, scaled, calculated, plotted by photogrammetric or remote sensing methods, or located by physical or cultural features.

“Improvement location certificate” means a representation of the boundaries of a parcel of land and the improvements thereon, prepared pursuant to section 38-51-108.

“Improvement survey plat” means a land survey plat as defined in subsection (12) of this section resulting from a monumented land survey showing the location of all structures, visible utilities, fences, hedges, or walls situated on the described parcel and within five feet of all boundaries of such parcel, any conflicting boundary evidence or visible encroachments, and all easements, underground utilities, and tunnels for which properly recorded evidence is available from the county clerk and recorder, a title insurance company, or other sources as specified on the improvement survey plat.

“Irregular parcel” means a parcel of land which is not uniquely defined on a subdivision plat but which is described by any of the following methods:

A metes and bounds description;

A book and page or reception number reference;

Any so-called “assessor’s tract”; or

A description which calls only for the owner’s or adjoiner’s name.

“Land survey” means a series of observations and measurements made pursuant to sections 38-51-103, 38-51-104, and 38-51-105 for the purpose of locating or restoring any real property boundary.

“Land survey plat” means a plat that shows the information developed by a monumented land survey or shows one or more set monuments pursuant to sections 38-51-104 and 38-51-105 and includes all information required by section 38-51-106.

(12.3)

“Monument” means the object or physical structure that marks the corner point.

“Monumented land survey” means a land survey in which monuments are either found or set pursuant to sections 38-51-103, 38-51-104, and 38-51-105 to mark the boundaries of a specified parcel of land.

“Monument record” means a written and illustrated document describing the physical appearance of a bench mark or survey monument and its accessories.

“Platted subdivision” means a group of lots, tracts, or parcels of land created by recording a map which meets the requirements of section 38-51-106 and which shows the boundaries of such lots, tracts, or parcels and the original parcel from which they were created.

“Professional land surveyor” means a person licensed pursuant to part 3 of article 120 of title 12.

(16.1)

“Professional land surveyor of record” means the professional land surveyor whose signature and seal appear on an original subdivision plat, land survey plat, or parcel description currently recorded in the office of the clerk and recorder in which the subdivision plat, land survey plat, or parcel description is situated.

“Property description” means a written, narrative description, of a parcel of real property or an easement for the purpose of perpetuating location of title.

“Public land survey monument” means any land boundary monument established on the ground by a cadastral survey of the United States government and any mineral survey monument established by a United States mineral surveyor and made a part of the United States public land records.

“Responsible charge” means control and direction of surveying work.

“Subdivision plat” means a map of a platted subdivision recorded for the purpose of creating land parcels which can be identified uniquely by reference to such map.

“Surveyor’s affidavit of correction” means an affidavit prepared and executed by a professional land surveyor of record in accordance with section 38-51-111.

History.

Source: L. 94:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1514, § 47, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(6) and (11) amended and (6.3) and (12.3) added, p. 1630, § 7, effective July 1; (7.5) added, p. 145, § 1, effective August 6.

L. 2004:

(5) and (16) amended, p. 1316, § 72, effective May 28.

L. 2007:

(12) amended, p. 294, § 6, effective August 3.

L. 2010:

(16.1) and (21) added,(HB 10-1085), ch. 95, p. 324, § 4, effective August 11.

L. 2019:

IP, (5), and (16) amended,(HB 19-1172), ch. 136, p. 1727, § 246, effective October 1.

Editor’s note:

The provisions of this section are similar to provisions of several former sections as they existed prior to 1994. For a detailed comparison, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

38-51-103.
Procedure for subdividing section.

Whenever a professional land surveyor conducts a survey for the purpose of locating a parcel of land which is described in terms of the nomenclature of the public land survey system, such professional land surveyor shall proceed according to the applicable rules contained in the current “Manual of Instructions for the Survey of the Public Lands of the United States” published by the United States government printing office; except that all monumentation shall conform to section 38-51-104.

A section may be subdivided by:

Surveying all necessary aliquot lines in the field; or

Computing the location of the required aliquot corners after making a field survey which includes all required control corners of the section.

Any section subdivided pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) shall include all control corners that were originally monumented by the United States government, which must either be found or restored in the field according to the standards set forth in section 38-51-104.

Monument records shall be filed pursuant to section 38-53-104, describing each such corner.

For any section subdivided pursuant to this subsection (2) the location of original aliquot corners of, and procedures used in, the governing official United States government survey, where applicable, shall take precedence.

History.

Source: L. 94:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1516, § 47, effective July 1.

Editor’s note:

This section is similar to former § 38-50-101, as it existed prior to 1994.

38-51-104.
Monumentation of land surveys.

The corners of lots, tracts, other parcels of land, aliquot corners not described in subsection (4) of this section, and any line points or reference points which are set to perpetuate the location of any land boundary or easement shall, when established on the ground by a land survey, be marked by reasonably permanent markers solidly embedded in the ground.

A durable cap bearing the license number of the professional land surveyor responsible for the establishment of the monument shall be affixed securely to the top of each such monument embedded pursuant to this subsection (1).

If the points designated in subsection (1) of this section fall on solid bedrock, concrete, stone curbs, gutters, or walks, a durable metal disk or cap shall be securely anchored in the rock or concrete and stamped with the license number of the professional land surveyor responsible for the establishment of the monument or marker.

If the monuments or markers required by subsection (1) of this section cannot practicably be set because of steep terrain, water, marsh, or existing structures, or if they would be lost as a result of proposed street, road, or other construction, one or more reference monuments shall be set.

The letters “RM” or “WC” and the surveyor’s license number shall be affixed to the monument.

For purposes of this paragraph (b), “RM” means reference monument and “WC” means witness corner.

Reference monuments shall be set as close as practicable to the true corner and shall meet the same physical standards required to set the true corner.

If only one reference monument is used, such reference monument shall be set on the actual boundary line or a prolongation thereof, otherwise at least two reference monuments shall be set.

For any monument required by this section that marks the location of a section corner, quarter section corner, or sixteenth section corner, such monument shall meet the physical standards specified by rule and regulation promulgated by the board pursuant to section 24-4-103, C.R.S.

The top of the monument for any corner required by this section which is within the traffic area of a publicly named dedicated or deeded street, road, or highway shall be placed one-half foot below the roadway surface.

If the roadway surface is pavement two inches thick or greater, the monument shall include a monument box the top of which shall be set flush with the surface of the pavement.

No marker required by this section shall bear the license number of more than one professional land surveyor but may bear the name of an individual surveyor or surveying firm in addition to the required license number.

History.

Source: L. 94:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1516, § 47, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(5) amended, p. 743, § 13, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(1)(b), (2), (3)(b)(I), and (6) amended,(SB 13-161), ch. 356, p. 2093, § 36, effective July 1.

Editor’s note:

This section is similar to former § 38-51-101, as it existed prior to 1994.

38-51-105.
Monumentation of subdivisions.

Prior to recording a plat, the external boundaries of any platted subdivisions shall be monumented on the ground by reasonably permanent monuments solidly embedded in the ground.

A durable cap bearing the license number of the professional land surveyor responsible for the establishment of the monument shall be affixed securely to the top of each such monument embedded pursuant to this subsection (1).

Monuments shall be set no more than fourteen hundred feet apart along any straight boundary line, at all angle points, at the beginning, end, and points of change of direction or change of radius of any curved boundaries defined by circular arcs, and at the beginning and end of any spiral curve.

The professional land surveyor who prepares the original subdivision plat, exemption plat, or subdivision exemption plat shall provide external boundary monuments as required in subsection (1) of this section.

Before a sales contract for any lot, tract, or parcel within a subdivision is executed, all boundaries of the block within which such lot, tract, or parcel is located shall be marked with monuments in accordance with subsection (1) of this section.

The seller of the lot, section, or parcel shall provide for the services of a professional land surveyor to establish block monumentation and lot markers as required pursuant to subsection (4) of this section.

Block monumentation may be set on the center lines of streets or on offset lines from such streets as designated on the recorded plat.

The corners of any lot, tract, or parcel sold separately shall be marked within one year of the effective date of the sales contract.

For any structure to be built on a lot, tract, or parcel before the corners have been marked pursuant to this section, the seller of such lot, tract, or parcel shall retain a professional land surveyor to establish control lines on the ground as necessary to assure the proper location of the structure.

For any complete block sold as a unit, it shall become the responsibility of the subsequent seller of any separate lot, tract, or parcel within such block to retain a professional land surveyor to establish lot markers as required pursuant to subsection (4) of this section.

For any points designated in subsection (1), (2), or (3) of this section that fall on solid bedrock, concrete, stone curbs, gutters, or walks, a durable metal disk or cap shall be securely anchored in the rock or concrete and stamped with the license number of the professional land surveyor responsible for the establishment of the monument or marker.

If any monuments or markers required by subsection (1), (2), or (3) of this section cannot practicably be set because of steep terrain, water, marsh, or existing structures, or if they would be lost as a result of proposed street, road, or other construction, one or more reference monuments shall be set.

The letters “RM” or “WC” shall be affixed to the monument in addition to the surveyor’s license number.

For purposes of this paragraph (b), “RM” means reference monument and “WC” means witness corner.

Reference monuments shall be set as close as practicable to the true corner and shall meet the same physical standards required to set the true corner.

If only one reference monument is used, such reference monument shall be set on the actual boundary line or a prolongation thereof, otherwise at least two reference monuments shall be set.

For any monument required by this section which marks the location of a section corner, quarter section corner, or sixteenth section corner, such monument shall meet the physical standards specified by rule and regulation promulgated by the board pursuant to section 24-4-103, C.R.S.

The top of the monument for any corner required by this section which is within the traffic area of a publicly named dedicated or deeded street, road, or highway shall be placed one-half foot below the roadway surface.

If the roadway surface is pavement two inches thick or greater, the monument shall include a monument box the top of which shall be set flush with the surface of the pavement.

No marker required by this section shall bear the license number of more than one professional land surveyor but may bear the name of an individual surveyor or surveying firm in addition to the required license number.

History.

Source: L. 94:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1518, § 47, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(1)(b), (6), (7)(b)(I), and (10) amended, p. 1317, § 73, effective May 28.

L. 2013:

(6) amended,(SB 13-161), ch. 356, p. 2094, § 37, effective July 1.

Editor’s note:

This section is similar to former § 38-51-101, as it existed prior to 1994.

38-51-106.
Land survey plats.

All land survey plats shall include but shall not be limited to the following:

A scale drawing of the boundaries of the land parcel;

All recorded and apparent rights-of-way and easements, and, if research for recorded rights-of-way and easements is done by someone other than the professional land surveyor who prepares the plat, the source from which such recorded rights-of-way and easements were obtained; or

If the client wishes not to show rights-of-way and easements on the land survey plat, a statement that such client did not want rights-of-way and easements shown;

All field-measured dimensions necessary to establish the boundaries on the ground and all dimensions for newly created parcels necessary to establish the boundaries on the ground;

A statement by the professional land surveyor that the survey was performed by such surveyor or under such surveyor’s responsible charge;

A statement by the professional land surveyor explaining how bearings, if used, were determined;

A description of all monuments, both found and set, that mark the boundaries of the property and of all control monuments used in conducting the survey. If any such boundary monument or control monument marks the location of a lost or obliterated public land survey monument that was restored as a part of the survey on which the plat is based, the professional land surveyor shall briefly describe the evidence and the procedure used for such restoration. If any such boundary monument or control monument marks the location of a quarter section corner or sixteenth section corner that was established as a part of the survey, the professional land surveyor shall briefly describe the evidence and procedure used for such establishment, unless the corner location was established by the mathematical procedure as outlined in section 38-51-103.

A statement of the scale or representative fraction of the drawing, and a bar-type or graphical scale;

A north arrow;

A written property description, which shall include but shall not be limited to a reference to the county and state together with the section, township, range, and principal meridian or established subdivision, block and lot number, or any other method of describing the land as established by the general land office or bureau of land management;

The signature and seal of the professional land surveyor;

Any conflicting boundary evidence; and

A statement defining the lineal units used including but not limited to meters, chains, feet, and U.S. survey feet. If it is necessary to define conversion factors, the factors shall be a function of the meter as defined by the United States department of commerce, national institute of standards and technology.

History.

Source: L. 94:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1519, § 47, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(1)(f) amended, p. 1317, § 74, effective May 28.

L. 2006:

(1)(f) amended, p. 338, § 2, effective August 7.

L. 2007:

(1)(c) amended and (1)(l) added, p. 294, § 7, effective August 3.

Editor’s note:

This section is similar to former § 38-51-102, as it existed prior to 1994.

38-51-107.
Required plats.

Every professional land surveyor who accepts a monument while performing a monumented land survey shall prepare and deposit a plat if such monument is not of record either in the clerk and recorder’s office of the county in which the monument lies or in the public office designated by the county commissioners pursuant to section 38-50-101 (2) or if such monument is set pursuant to section 38-51-104.

No plat shall be required to be prepared or deposited if the monuments accepted or set are within a platted subdivision that was filed in the clerk and recorder’s office within the previous twenty years.

Plats required pursuant to this section shall comply with section 38-50-101.

History.

Source: L. 94:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1520, § 47, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(2) amended, p. 151, § 1, effective March 28.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 1317, § 75, effective May 28.

Editor’s note:

This section is similar to former § 38-51-107 (1), as it existed prior to 1994.

38-51-108.
Improvement location certificate.

A professional land surveyor may prepare an improvement location certificate for the use of a specific client based upon the professional land surveyor’s general knowledge of land boundaries and monuments in a given area whether or not the client is the owner or buyer; except that, if the client is not the owner or buyer, the professional land surveyor shall provide a copy of the certificate to the owner or buyer.

A certificate prepared pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall not be designated as or construed as being a land survey plat or improvement survey plat.

Such certificate shall be prominently labeled “improvement location certificate” and contain a statement in the following form:

IMPROVEMENT LOCATION CERTIFICATE

I hereby certify that this improvement location certificate was prepared for .... (individual or firm) ...., that it is not a land survey plat or improvement survey plat, and that it is not to be relied upon for the establishment of fence, building, or other future improvement lines. This certificate is valid only for use by .... (individual or firm) .... and describes the parcel’s appearance on .... (date) .... I further certify that the improvements on the above described parcel on this date, .... (insert date) ...., except utility connections, are entirely within the boundaries of the parcel, except as shown, that there are no encroachments upon the described premises by improvements on any adjoining premises, except as indicated, and that there is no apparent evidence or sign of any easement crossing or burdening any part of said parcel, except as noted.
:u360 Stamp =sr By ............ (Signed) .............
:u360
or
:u360 Seal =sr Date ...................................

A professional land surveyor shall assume full liability for each improvement location certificate done by such professional land surveyor or under such professional land surveyor’s responsible charge pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (2).

History.

Source: L. 94:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1521, § 47, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(1) and (2)(a)(II) amended,(SB 13-161), ch. 356, p. 2094, § 38, effective July 1.

Editor’s note:

This section is similar to former § 38-51-105, as it existed prior to 1994.

38-51-109.
Unlawful sale.

It is unlawful for any person to offer to sell, to sell, or otherwise to receive remuneration for any map or plat which purports to be a survey map or plat unless such map or plat conforms with the standards, requirements, and terminology of the provisions of this article.

It is unlawful for any person to offer to sell, to sell, or otherwise to receive remuneration for any document, sketch, or diagram which purports to be an improvement location certificate unless such document, sketch, or diagram conforms with the standards, requirements, and terminology of this article.

History.

Source: L. 94:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1521, § 47, effective July 1.

Editor’s note:

This section is similar to former § 38-51-106, as it existed prior to 1994.

38-51-109.3.
Geographic information system positions - professional land surveyor.

A professional land surveyor shall be exempt from the requirements of section 38-51-103 when making a GIS land position determination. A GIS land position made by a professional land surveyor shall have the following limitations:

It does not meet the requirements of a land survey as defined in section 38-51-102 (11).

It shall not establish the location of any aliquot or control corner as they are defined in subsections (2) and (6) of section 38-51-102 until complete research and corner evaluation are performed to meet the requirements as provided in this article.

History.

Source: L. 97:

Entire section added, p. 145, § 2, effective August 6; (1)(b) amended, p. 1032, § 70, effective August 6.

38-51-110.
Violations.

It is the responsibility of the district attorneys of this state to prosecute any person suspected of willfully and knowingly violating this article.

Any person, including the responsible official of any agency of state, county, or local government, who willfully and knowingly violates this article is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not less than one hundred fifty dollars or more than one thousand five hundred dollars.

The board may revoke the licensure of any professional land surveyor convicted under the provisions of this article.

Any person whose licensure is revoked pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (3) shall be entitled to a hearing on such revocation pursuant to article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., and may appeal any decision of the board to a court of competent jurisdiction.

History.

Source: L. 94:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1522, § 47, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(3)(b) amended, p. 1630, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(3) amended, p. 1318, § 76, effective May 28.

Editor’s note:

This section is similar to former § 38-51-104, as it existed prior to 1994.

38-51-111.
Surveyor’s affidavit of correction.

If an error described in subsection (2) of this section is discovered on any subdivision plat, land survey plat, or any other survey plat or parcel description duly recorded in the clerk and recorder’s office of the county in which the subdivision, land, or parcel is situated, the professional land surveyor of record may prepare and record in that clerk and recorder’s office a surveyor’s affidavit of correction to correct the error.

The following errors may be corrected by a surveyor’s affidavit of correction:

Any bearing, distance, or elevation that has been omitted or labeled incorrectly;

Any text that has been misspelled or mislabeled;

Any error or omission, if the error or omission is ascertainable from the data shown on the recorded plat or parcel description; or

An error within a parcel description shown on a recorded plat.

The surveyor’s affidavit of correction shall contain a reference to the recording information of the document being corrected and the signature and seal of the professional land surveyor of record, and shall not be subject to review before being recorded pursuant to subsection (4) of this section. The professional land surveyor of record shall submit a copy of the surveyor’s affidavit of correction to the appropriate reviewing authority, citing the specific provision under subsection (2) of this section that applies to the error being corrected.

The clerk and recorder of the county in which a surveyor’s affidavit of correction is submitted for recording shall record the affidavit in the clerk and recorder’s office of the county in which the property lies and provide at least one of the following:

A clerk’s note referring to the surveyor’s affidavit of correction upon the recorded plat or parcel description; or

An electronic reference to the surveyor’s affidavit of correction for the recorded plat or parcel description.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to permit changes in courses, distances, or elevations for the purpose of redesigning any lot, tract, or parcel configurations.

A surveyor’s affidavit of correction shall not be recorded for a correction not listed in subsection (2) of this section.

History.

Source:
L. 2010:

Entire section added, (HB 10-1085), ch. 95, p. 324, § 5, effective August 11.